North Dakota statutes. TITLE 29 Judicial Procedure, Criminal
CHAPTER 29-04 Limitations

29-04-01.
Prosecution for murder not limited.

There is no limitation of the time within which a prosecution for murder must be commenced. It may be commenced at any time after the death of the person killed.

Source:

C. Crim. P. 1877, § 88; R.C. 1895, § 7876; R.C. 1899, § 7876; R.C. 1905, § 9684; C.L. 1913, § 10520; R.C. 1943, § 29-0401.

Collateral References.

Conviction of lesser offense, against which statute of limitations has run, where statute has not run against offense with which defendant is charged, 47 A.L.R.2d 887.

29-04-02.
Prosecution for felony other than murder within three years.

Except as otherwise provided by law, a prosecution for any felony other than murder must be commenced within three years after its commission. Prosecution of felony offenses under chapter 12.1-23 or 50-24.8 must be commenced within the later of three years of commission of the last act that is an element of the offense, three years of discovery of the stolen property, or three years of discovery of the loss of the property or services. Nothing in this section prevents a person prosecuted for murder from being found guilty of any included offense and punished accordingly.

Source:

C. Crim. P. 1877, § 89; R.C. 1895, § 7877; R.C. 1899, § 7877; R.C. 1905, § 9685; C.L. 1913, § 10521; R.C. 1943, § 29-0402; S.L. 1987, ch. 390, § 1; 2011, ch. 236, § 1; 2021, ch. 175, § 5, effective August 1, 2021.

29-04-02.1.
Prosecution for gross sexual imposition or human trafficking.

Except as otherwise provided by law, a prosecution for a violation of subdivision a of subsection 1 of section 12.1-20-03 or for the crime of human trafficking must be commenced in the proper court within seven years after the commission of the offense.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 134, § 10; 2015, ch. 236, § 1, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 236, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

29-04-03.
Prosecution for misdemeanor or infraction within two years.

A prosecution of a misdemeanor or infraction, except as otherwise provided by law, must be commenced within two years after its commission. Prosecution of misdemeanor offenses under chapter 12.1-23 must be commenced within the later of two years of commission of the last act that is an element of the offense, two years of discovery of the stolen property, or two years of discovery of the loss of the property or services.

Source:

R.C. 1895, § 7878; R.C. 1899, § 7878; R.C. 1905, § 9686; C.L. 1913, § 10522; R.C. 1943, § 29-0403; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 325; 1987, ch. 390, § 2; 2011, ch. 236, § 2.

29-04-03.1.
Prosecution for sexual abuse of minors.

Except as provided in subsection 2, a prosecution for a violation of sections 12.1-20-03 through 12.1-20-08 or of section 12.1-20-11 if the victim was under eighteen years of age at the time the offense was committed must be commenced in the proper court within twenty-one years after the commission of the offense or, if the victim failed to report the offense within this limitation period, within three years after the offense was reported to law enforcement authorities.

If, based upon evidence containing deoxyribonucleic acid or a fingerprint obtained at the time of offense, a suspect is conclusively identified by deoxyribonucleic acid testing after the time period prescribed in subsection 1 has expired, a prosecution may be commenced within three years after the suspect is conclusively identified by the deoxyribonucleic acid testing or fingerprint authentication.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 359, § 1; 1987, ch. 390, § 3; 1993, ch. 331, § 1; 2015, ch. 234, § 2, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 228, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 268, § 2, effective August 1, 2019.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 2 of chapter 234, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

29-04-03.2.
Statute of limitations as to child victim.

If the victim of a violation of chapter 12.1-20 or of the crime of human trafficking is under the age of fifteen, the applicable period of limitation, if any, does not begin to run until the victim has reached the age of fifteen.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 391, § 1; 2015, ch. 236, § 2, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by
section 2 of chapter 236, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

29-04-04.
Time of defendant’s absence not part of limitation.

If, when a crime or public offense is committed, the defendant is out of the state, or if the defendant is within the state and subsequently leaves the state, the information may be filed, or the indictment found, within the time herein limited, after the defendant’s return to the state. No time during which the defendant is not an inhabitant of, or usually resident within, this state is part of the limitation.

Source:

C. Crim. P. 1877, § 90; R.C. 1895, § 7879; R.C. 1899, § 7879; R.C. 1905, § 9687; C.L. 1913, § 10523; S.L. 1925, ch. 124, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 10523; R.C. 1943, § 29-0404.

29-04-05.
When prosecution is commenced.

A prosecution is commenced when a uniform complaint and summons, a complaint, or an information is filed or when a grand jury indictment is returned.

Source:

C. Crim. P. 1877, § 91; R.C. 1895, § 7880; R.C. 1889, § 7880; R.C. 1905, § 9688; C.L. 1913, § 10524; R.C. 1943, § 29-0405; 2011, ch. 237, § 1.

Decisions under Prior Law

Information Sufficient.

Requirements Not Followed.

Theft.

Information Sufficient.

Where defendant entered a not guilty plea without objecting to the information, the information was not invalid under N.D.C.C. § 29-09-02(3) and the appellate court rejected defendant’s claim that an information could not be filed under N.D.R.Crim.P., Rule 7(a) until after a preliminary examination was held, the information received was sufficient to commence the action against defendant under N.D.C.C. § 29-04-05, within the five-year statute of limitations in N.D.C.C. § 10-04-18(4).

State v. Noorlun, 2005 ND 189, 705 N.W.2d 819, 2005 N.D. LEXIS 225 (N.D. 2005), cert. denied, 547 U.S. 1196, 126 S. Ct. 2869, 165 L. Ed. 2d 902, 2006 U.S. LEXIS 4590 (U.S. 2006).

Requirements Not Followed.

Although criminal complaints charging defendant with nine class C felonies were filed in county court in June, 1987, those complaints were not filed by a magistrate having jurisdiction to hear, try, and determine the action as required by the plain language of this section. Therefore, the prosecutions against defendant were commenced by the filing of the informations in district court on December 21, 1987. State v. Hersch, 445 N.W.2d 626, 1989 N.D. LEXIS 160 (N.D. 1989).

Theft.

For purposes of the statute of limitations under N.D.C.C. § 29-04-02 as it read prior to 1987 amendment, prosecution for the felony of theft against defendant was commenced by the filing of the information in district court, and not by the filing of the complaint with the county court acting as a committing magistrate. State v. Dimmler, 456 N.W.2d 297, 1990 N.D. LEXIS 122 (N.D. 1990).